Hawaii, session 2026, HB88.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the benefits of providing students with opportunities to participate in athletics extend beyond improved physical fitness. Multiple studies have concluded that student athletes tend to have higher academic achievement compared to non-athletes and have suggested that participating in sports improves discipline and time management, resulting in improved grades, graduation rates, and career outcomes.  Studies have also shown that student athletes experience better mental health outcomes including lower rates of stress, anxiety, and depression and higher levels of emotional well-being when compared to their non-athlete peers. The legislature further finds that student athletes in certain counties encounter difficulties in traveling to other schools to compete.  For example, as a multi-island jurisdiction, Maui county students participating in school sports face unique and burdensome challenges when attending competitions within the county, including the cost of air or sea travel and access to reasonable lodging accommodations.  Multiple days of travel are often required for Maui county student athletes to attend competitions on a non-home island.  This requires significant fundraising efforts and logistical planning, which may include chartering boats or planes, renting multiple vehicles, recruiting volunteers on a non-home island to house, feed, and shuttle students, coaches, and chaperones, sleeping on gym floors, and relying on unhealth but convenient food. The legislature notes that the travel costs for student athletes to compete within Maui county presents a significant and unique financial and logistical burden for both the athletes and their families, which may affect the ability of the student athletes to compete at their highest form.  The legislature believes that providing a funding mechanism to cover intra‑county travel expenses of certain student athletes is essential for ensuring equitable access to the opportunities and benefits provided through participating in school sports and athletics. The purpose of this Act is to establish and appropriate funds for a student athlete travel pilot program to provide funds for intra-county travel expenses for student athletes of counties with a population of less than five hundred thousand. SECTION 2.  (a) There is established a three-year student athlete travel pilot program, to be administered by the department of education, to provide funding for intra-county travel expenses for student athletes of counties with a population of less than five hundred thousand. (b)  The department of education may collaborate with private entities and volunteers for the chartering or rental of transportation and housing for participating students of the pilot program. (c)  The department of education shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, on the student athlete travel pilot program to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2028.  The report shall include: (1)  The number of student athletes participating in the pilot program; (2)  The total amount of funds used for the pilot program and amount of funds used for each student athlete; and (3)  The companies the pilot program contracted with to provide transportation to student athletes. (d)  The pilot program shall cease to exist on June 30, 2028. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment and implementation of the student athlete travel pilot program pursuant to section 2 of this Act; provided that the funds appropriated may be used for the hiring of an athletic clerk to assist with travel procurement and the implementation of the pilot program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000, and shall be repealed on June 30, 2028.